Massachusetts, session 194th, H3674.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 422 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 424 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 459 after the word “owners” the 
following: - or lessees.  
SECTION 4. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 471 after the word “owners” the 
following: - or lessees.  

of 5 13  SECTION 5. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 478 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 6. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 480 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 7. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 487 after the word “owners” the 
following: - or lessees.  
SECTION 8. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 491 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 9. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 493 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 10. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 500 after the word “owner” the 
following: - or lessee.  
SECTION 11. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 504 after the word “owner” the 
following: - or lessee.  

of 5 34  SECTION 12. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 505 after the word “owner” the 
following: - or lessee.  
SECTION 13. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 506 after the word “owner” the 
following: - or lessee.  
SECTION 14. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 509 after the word “owners” the 
following: - or lessees.  
SECTION 15. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 514 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 16. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 520 after the word “owners” the 
following: - or lessees.  
SECTION 17. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 524 after the word “owner” the 
following: - or lessee.  
SECTION 18. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 537 after the word “owners” the 
following: - or lessees.  

of 5 55  SECTION 19. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 542 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 20. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 552 after the word “owner” the 
following: - or lessee.  
SECTION 21. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 554 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 22. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 561 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 23. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 562 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 24. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 568 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 25. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 570 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  

of 5 76  SECTION 26. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 571 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 27. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 580 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.  
SECTION 28. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 584 after the word “owned” the 
following: - or leased.